Louisiana, session 2026, HB904.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:550.4, 550.10(E) and (F), 550.11, 550.13(E), 550.20,
550.21(introductory paragraph) and (1), 550.23(H), and 550.24(A) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 22:550.3(D), 550.14(B)(5), and 550.21(4) are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§550.3. Applicability of other provisions
* * *
D. The commissioner may waive any requirements imposed in this Title for
risk retention groups, unless the waiver would violate the accreditation requirements
of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 904 ENROLLED
§550.4. Regulations
The commissioner may promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with
the Administrative Procedure Act as are necessary to implement and enforce the
provisions of this Subpart and to comply with accreditation standards of the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners applicable to risk retention groups
chartered and licensed as a captive insurance company.
* * *
§550.10. Capital and surplus requirements
* * *
E. Except as otherwise provided by the commissioner pursuant to Subsection
F of this Section, the capital required to be maintained pursuant to this Section shall
be in the form of cash, cash equivalents, bonds, marketable securities, surplus
debentures, letters of credit, a trust approved by the commissioner and pledged to the
commissioner, or evidences of indebtedness which are direct general obligations of
the government of the United States, or any other form of capital as approved by the
commissioner.
F. The commissioner may prescribe additional other forms of capital or other
requirements relating to capital and surplus based on the type, volume, and nature
of the insurance business that is transacted by the captive insurance company or risk
retention group chartered and licensed in this state.
§550.11. Deposit required of association captive insurers
A. Before receiving a certificate of authority, all association captive
insurance companies shall deposit with the commissioner a safekeeping or trust
receipt from a bank located in the state and doing business within the state or from
a savings and loan association chartered to do business in this state indicating that
the association captive insurance company has deposited one hundred thousand
dollars in money or bonds of the United States, the state of Louisiana, or any
political subdivision thereof, of the par value of not less than one hundred thousand
dollars. All securities deposited pursuant to this Section shall be held in trust for the
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 904 ENROLLED
benefit and protection of and as security for all policyholders of the association
captive insurance company making the deposit.
B. The commissioner may require a captive insurance company or a risk
retention group chartered and licensed in this state to deposit with the commissioner
a safekeeping or trust receipt from a bank located in this state and doing business
within this state or from a savings and loan association chartered to do business in
this state indicating that the captive insurance company or risk retention group has
deposited money or bonds of the United States, this state, or a political subdivision
of this state in an amount determined by the commissioner to address any financial
solvency concerns. All securities deposited pursuant to this Section shall be held in
trust for the benefit and protection of, and as security for, the policyholders of the
captive insurance company or risk retention group or to address financial solvency
concerns of the captive insurance company or risk retention group.
* * *
§550.13. Authorized and prohibited types of insurance
* * *
E.(1) An association captive insurance company shall not expose itself to
loss on any one risk in an amount which exceeds ten percent of the captive insurer's
capital and surplus. A risk, or any portion thereof, which has been reinsured shall
be deducted in determining the limitation of risk prescribed in this Section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, the
commissioner may grant authorization to a captive insurance company or a risk
retention group chartered and licensed in this state to expose itself to loss on a single
risk in any amount up to thirty percent of the capital and surplus of the captive
insurance company or risk retention group. A risk, or any portion thereof, which has
been reinsured shall be deducted in determining the limitation of risk prescribed in
this Section.
* * *
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 904 ENROLLED
§550.14. Formation and meetings of board of directors; additional requirements to
transact insurance
* * *
B. A captive insurance company shall not engage in any insurance business
in this state unless it complies with all of the following:
* * *
(5) Board members of risk retention groups that are chartered and licensed
in this state shall comply with the corporate governance standards for domestic risk
retention groups established by the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners.
* * *
§550.20. Prohibition on ownership Ownership by an insurance company
A captive insurance company shall not do business in this state if an
insurance company is directly or indirectly a member or owner of such captive
insurance company, except when the member of the captive insurance company are
all insurance companies. A captive insurance company or risk retention group
chartered and licensed in this state may do business in this state, regardless of
whether an insurance company is directly or indirectly a member or owner of the
captive insurance company or risk retention group.
§550.21. Annual report of financial condition to commissioner; regulations
designating form; alternative date to file annual report
Every captive insurance company and risk retention group chartered and
licensed in this state shall file each of the following with the department:
(1) Annually on or before March first, a statement of its financial condition
for the year ending December thirty-first immediately preceding, and any
amendment to the plan of operation at last year-end, verified by the oath of at least
two of its executive officers. For a captive insurance company, The the statement
shall be in the form prescribed by the commissioner. Risk retention groups chartered
and licensed in this state shall use the appropriate National Association of Insurance
Commissioners Annual Statement Blank prepared in accordance with the
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 904 ENROLLED
Instructions Handbook adopted by the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners, as applicable. Risk retention groups chartered and licensed in this
state shall follow the accounting procedures and practices prescribed by the
Accounting Practices and Procedures Manual adopted by the National Association
of Insurance Commissioners, unless otherwise provided in law.
* * *
(4) Risk retention groups chartered and licensed in this state are required to
maintain governance standards that are substantially similar to the standards adopted
by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.
* * *
§550.23. Taxes on premiums and assessments
* * *
H. The premium tax revenues collected pursuant to this Section shall be
transferred annually to the department for the regulation of captive insurance
companies pursuant to this Subpart. The commissioner may withhold the funds
collected pursuant to this Section to defray the expense of collecting taxes imposed
by this Section and the enforcement of this Subpart and for the operation of the
department.
* * *
§550.24. Rates
A. Each captive insurance company and risk retention group chartered and
licensed in this state may be required by the commissioner to shall file rates for
property and casualty lines of insurance in accordance with Subpart O of Part IV of
Chapter 4 of this Title, R.S. 22:1451 et seq. on an actuarially justified basis with the
department. and may use the rates forty-five days after filing, unless the department
disapproves the use of rates within the forty-five period. For all other lines of
insurance, captive insurance companies shall file rates on an actuarially justified
basis with the department and may use the rates within the forty-five day period If
the commissioner requires a captive insurance company or risk retention group
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 904 ENROLLED
chartered and licensed in this state to file its rates with the department, the
commissioner may disapprove a filing if it raises financial solvency concerns.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.